Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-240
Judge or clerk of election; district inspector; excused from serving; when.

Any person who is appointed to serve as a judge or clerk of election or district inspector may, at any time before election day, be excused by the county clerk from serving in such capacity by reason of his or her own sickness, the serious illness of any member of his or her family, or unavoidable absence from the county on election day.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 60;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 27;

Laws 1999, LB 802, § 10.